Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2128
Ejectment; occupying claimants; rights.

The parties in an action for the recovery of property may avail themselves, if entitled thereto, of the relief provided for in sections 76-301 to 76-311 for occupying claimants.

R.S.1867, Code § 632, p. 506;

R.S.1913, § 8234;

C.S.1922, § 9196;

C.S.1929, § 20-2128;

R.S.1943, § 25-2128.

To recover under occupying claimant's act, defendant must have made improvements or paid taxes while in good faith claiming title. Carter v. Brown, 35 Neb. 670, 53 N.W. 580 (1892).

Measure of recovery by occupying claimant is the amount the improvements add to value of property. Fletcher v. Brown, 35 Neb. 660, 53 N.W. 577 (1892).